Wyoming, session 2025, SF0110.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 1-39-103(a)(iv) by creating a new
subparagraph (H) is amended to read:
1-39-103. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(iv) "Public employee":
(H) Includes volunteers and school district
employees acting as a roadway crossing guard on behalf of
or in service of a public school district legally organized
as a body corporate pursuant to W.S. 21-3-101, et seq.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0110
ENROLLED ACT NO. 36, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2